Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.290

Writings as public records.

Any writing received, owned, used, or retained by the department in connection with the provisions of this chapter is a public record and, as such, is open to public inspection. Copies of such records provided for public inspection shall comply with RCW 42.56.070(1). The names of duly authorized officers, employees, or agents of the department shall be included.

[ 2005 c 274 s 225; 1980 c 184 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 9.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—1980 c 184: See RCW 74.42.630.